Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6877XC (3) 91 th/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.438, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. a. If a person operates on the highway 3 a motor vehicle equipped with a front windshield that meets a 4 minimum standard of transparency of less than fifty percent 5 light transmittance, a peace officer shall issue a citation for 6 a violation of subsection 2 and impound the motor vehicle. In 7 lieu of the officer impounding the motor vehicle, the person 8 may instead do any of the following: 9 (1) Immediately remove or modify the material that was 10 applied to the windshield until the windshield meets a minimum 11 standard of transparency of at least seventy percent light 12 transmittance. 13 (2) Remove the motor vehicle from the highway without 14 unreasonable delay by towing the vehicle or by having the 15 vehicle towed. 16 b. A person shall not operate on the highway a vehicle 17 that is impounded or towed pursuant to this subsection until 18 the vehicleâs front windshield meets a minimum standard of 19 transparency of at least seventy percent light transmittance. 20 c. Paragraph âaâ does not apply to a person who operates 21 a motor vehicle owned or leased by a federal, state, or local 22 law enforcement agency if the operation is part of the personâs 23 official duties. 24